Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB793.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 65.8925 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [By January 1, 2012, ]The commissioners of a regional wastewater commission
established under the provisions of KRS 65.8901 to 65.8923 shall provide public
access to records relating to expenditures of the commission through display of the
records on a website[Web site].
(2) The website[Web site] shall be in a searchable format and shall provide financial
information about expenditures not exempt under the provisions of state or federal
law, including:
(a) The payee name;
(b) The category or type of expenditure;
(c) A description of the reason for the expenditure, if available;
(d) The expenditure amount;
(e) An electronic link to documents relating to the expenditure, if the documents
are available electronically;
(f) The budget adopted by the commission and subsequent amendments to that
budget;
(g) The completed annual audit results; and
(h) Any other information deemed relevant by the commission.
(3) Information on the website[Web site] shall be updated at least on a monthly basis
and shall be maintained on the website[Web site] for at least three (3) years.
(4) (a) The regional wastewater commission shall register with the Department for
Local Government as required by KRS 65A.090.
(b) [For fiscal periods beginning on and after July 1, 2014, ]The provisions of
KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090 shall apply to regional wastewater commissions.
Commissioners shall work with the Department for Local Government to
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:48 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2444
provide the information required by this section through the registry
established by KRS 65A.020.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:48 AM Jacketed